src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_irregular_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRootIrregular
@P.Paradigm.VTA@ VTA_Irregular ;

LEXICON VTA_Irregular
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+2PlObj:gidinininim # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+2SgObj:gidinin # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+3PlObvObj:nindinaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+3PlProxObj:nindinaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+3SgObvObj:nindinimaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj+3SgProxObj:nindinaa # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+1SgObj:gidizhim # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+3PlObvObj:gidinimaawaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+3PlProxObj:gidinaawaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+3SgObvObj:gidinaawaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+3SgProxObj:gidinaawaa # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj+ExclObj:gidizhinaam # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+1SgObj:gidizh # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+3PlObvObj:gidinaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+3PlProxObj:gidinaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+3SgObvObj:gidinimaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+3SgProxObj:gidinaa # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj+ExclObj:gidizhinaam # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+3PlProxObj:odigowaa' # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+3PlProxObj:odigowaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+3SgProxObj:odigoo' # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+3SgProxObj:odigoon # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+1SgObj:nindigoog # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+2PlObj:gidigowaag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+2SgObj:gidigoog # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+3PlObvObj:odinaawaa' # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+3PlObvObj:odinaawaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+3SgObvObj:odinaawaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:nindigonaanig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+InclObj:gidigonaanig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj+3PlProxObj:odigowaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj+3SgProxObj:odigoon # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+1SgObj:nindig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+2PlObj:gidigowaa # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+2SgObj:gidig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+3PlObvObj:odinaa' # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+3PlObvObj:odinaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+3SgObvObj:odinaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:nindigonaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj+InclObj:gidigonaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+2PlObj:gidigoom # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+2SgObj:gidigoo # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+3PlObvObj:nindinaanaanig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+3PlProxObj:nindinaanaanig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+3SgObvObj:nindinimaanaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+3SgProxObj:nindinaanaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+3PlObvObj:gidinaanaanig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+3PlProxObj:gidinaanaanig # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+3SgObvObj:gidinimaanaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+InclSubj+3SgProxObj:gidinaanaan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+1SgObj:nindigoo # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+2PlObj:gidigoom # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+2SgObj:gidigoo # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlObvObj:inimaawa' # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlObvObj:inimaawan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlProxObj:inaawag # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgObvObj:inimaawan # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgProxObj:inaa # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+ExclObj:nindigoomin # ;
izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:gidigoomin # ;
